Utah statutes.
53A-28-102.   Definitions.
(1)  "Board" means the board of education of a school district existing now or
later under the laws of the state.
(2)  "Bond" means any general obligation bond or refunding bond issued after
the effective date of this chapter.
(3)  "Default avoidance program" means the school bond guaranty program
established by this chapter.
(4)  "General obligation bond" means any  bond, note, warrant, certificate of
indebtedness, or other obligation of a board payable in whole or in part from
revenues derived from ad valorem taxes and that constitutes an indebtedness
within the meaning of any applicable constitutional or statutory debt
limitation.
(5)  "Paying agent" means the corporate paying agent selected by the board for
a bond issue who is:
(a)  duly qualified; and
(b)  acceptable to the state treasurer.
(6)  "Permanent school fund" means the state school fund described in the Utah
Constitution, Article X, Section 5(1).
(7)  "Refunding bond" means any general obligation bond issued by a board for
the purpose of refunding its outstanding general obligation bonds.
(8)  "School district" means any school district existing now or later under
the laws of the state.
